Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Abuse Prevention for Vulnerable
Adults

§ 6931.
Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in section 6902 of this title, as used in this subchapter, “interested person” means a representative of the vulnerable adult; the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living; or the Commissioner’s designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 134;

2021, No. 20

, § 347.

§ 6932.
Jurisdiction and venue.

The Family Division of the Superior Court shall have jurisdiction over proceedings under this subchapter.

Emergency orders under section 6936 of this title may be issued by a judge of the Criminal, Civil, or Family Division of the Superior Court.

Proceedings under this subchapter may be commenced in the county in which the plaintiff resides. If the vulnerable adult has left the residence to avoid abuse or exploitation, the plaintiff shall have the option to bring an action in the county of the previous residence or the county of the new residence.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 233.

§ 6933.
Request for relief.

A vulnerable adult or an interested person on behalf of a vulnerable adult may seek relief from abuse, neglect, or exploitation by filing a petition requesting one or both of the following orders:

that the defendant refrain from abusing, neglecting, or exploiting the vulnerable adult;

that the defendant immediately vacate the household.

No filing fee shall be required.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6934.
Notice.

Except as provided in section 6936 of this title, the court shall grant relief only after notice to the defendant and a hearing. If the petition is made by an interested person, notice shall be provided to the vulnerable adult and the court shall determine whether the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her wishes with respect to the petition and if so, whether the vulnerable adult wishes to pursue the petition. If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her opinion and does not wish to pursue the petition, the court shall dismiss the petition.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6935.
Findings and order.

If the court finds that the defendant has abused, neglected, or exploited the vulnerable adult, the court shall make such order as it deems necessary to protect the vulnerable adult. The plaintiff shall have the burden of proving abuse, neglect, or exploitation by a preponderance of the evidence. Relief shall be granted for a fixed period of time, at the expiration of which the court may extend any order, upon motion of the plaintiff, for such additional time as it deems necessary to protect the vulnerable adult from abuse, neglect, or exploitation. The court may modify its order at any subsequent time upon motion by either party and a showing of a substantial change in circumstances. If the motion for extension or modification of the order is made by an interested person, notice shall be provided to the vulnerable adult, and the court shall determine whether the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her wishes with respect to the motion and, if so, whether the vulnerable adult wishes to request an extension or modification. If the court determines the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her wishes and does not wish to pursue the motion, the court shall dismiss the motion.

Every order under this subchapter shall contain the name of the court, the names of the parties, the date of the petition, and the date and time of the order, and shall be signed by the judge.

Form complaints and form orders shall be provided by the Court Administrator and shall be maintained by the clerks of the courts.

Every order issued under this subchapter shall bear the following language: “VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS A CRIME SUBJECT TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR A FINE, OR BOTH, AND MAY ALSO BE PROSECUTED AS CRIMINAL CONTEMPT PUNISHABLE BY FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, OR BOTH.”

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6936.
Emergency relief; hearings.

In accordance with the Rules for Family Proceedings, temporary orders under this subchapter may be issued ex parte, without notice to the defendant, upon motion and findings by the court that the defendant has abused, neglected, or exploited the vulnerable adult and that serious and irreparable harm to the physical health or financial interests of the vulnerable adult will result without ex parte relief.

If the petition is made by an interested person, notice shall be provided to the vulnerable adult and the court shall determine whether the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her wishes with respect to the petition and if so, whether the vulnerable adult wishes to pursue the petition. If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is capable of expressing his or her opinion and does not wish to pursue the petition, the court shall dismiss the petition.

In addition to the information required under subsection 6935(b) of this title, every order issued under this section shall state upon its face a date, time, and place when the defendant may appear to petition the court for modification or discharge of the order. When service of the temporary order cannot be made before the scheduled hearing, the court shall continue the hearing and extend the terms of any temporary order upon request of the plaintiff for such additional time as it deems necessary to achieve service on the defendant. The defendant’s opportunity to contest shall be scheduled as soon as reasonably possible, but in no event later than 10 days from the date of issuance of the order.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 6937.
Service.

A petition or ex parte temporary order or final order issued under this subchapter shall be served by any sheriff or constable or any municipal or State Police officer in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. A court that issues an order under this chapter during court hours shall promptly transmit the order electronically or by other means to a law enforcement agency for service.

A defendant who attends a hearing held under section 6935 of this title at which a temporary or final order under this chapter is issued and who receives notice from the court on the record that the order has been issued shall be deemed to have been served. A defendant notified by the court on the record shall be required to adhere immediately to the provisions of the order. However, even when the court has previously notified the defendant of the order, the court shall transmit the order for additional service by a law enforcement agency.

The person making service shall file a return of service with the court stating the date, time, and place at which the order was delivered personally to the defendant.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 17

, § 5;

2013, No. 17

, § 6, eff. Nov. 1, 2013.

§ 6938.
Procedure.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, proceedings commenced under this subchapter shall be in accordance with the Rules for Family Proceedings and shall be in addition to any other available civil or criminal remedies.

If the petition is filed by an interested person, the court may in its discretion appoint a guardian ad litem for the vulnerable adult.

The Court Administrator shall establish procedures to ensure access to relief after regular court hours, or on weekends and holidays. The Court Administrator is authorized to contract with public or private agencies to assist persons to seek relief and to gain access to Superior Court judges. Law enforcement agencies shall assist in carrying out the intent of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 13, 2002;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 234.

§ 6939.
Filing orders with law enforcement personnel; Department of Public Safety Protection Order Database.

Police departments, sheriff’s departments, and State Police district offices shall establish procedures for filing orders issued under this subchapter and for making personnel aware of the existence and contents of such orders.

Any court in this State that issues an order under this subchapter shall transmit a copy of the order to the Department of Public Safety Protective Order Database.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Oct. 1, 2006.

§ 6940.
Enforcement.

Law enforcement officers are authorized to enforce orders issued under this subchapter.

Violation of an order issued under this subchapter may be prosecuted as criminal contempt under Rule 42 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure. The prosecution for criminal contempt may be initiated by the State’s Attorney in the Family Division of the Superior Court in the county that issued the order. The maximum penalty that may be imposed under this subsection shall be a fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for six months, or both. A sentence of imprisonment upon conviction for criminal contempt may be stayed in the discretion of the court pending the expiration of the time allowed for filing notice of appeal or pending appeal if any appeal is taken.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 6941.
Appeals.

An order of the court issued under section 6935 of this title shall be treated as a final order for the purposes of appeal. Appeal may be taken by either party to the Supreme Court under the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure and the appeal shall be determined forthwith.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.